New Jersey, session 221, A1606.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 158 of P.L.2012, c.16 (C.30:4C-4.4) is amended to read as follows: 158. a. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, commencing on or after the effective date of [P.L.2012, c.16 (C.52:27D-43.9a et al.)] P.L.    , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and subject to the provisions of subsection b. of this section, the Division of Children's System of Care in the Department of Children and Families shall determine eligibility and provide support and services, deemed clinically and functionally appropriate by the Department of Children and Families, as limited by service availability and appropriations and other monies available, and to become available, for persons with developmental disabilities, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1977, c.82 (C.30:6D-3), under [21] 30 years of age.  The Division of Children's System of Care shall be responsible for licensing, inspection, and standard-setting with regard to facilities providing services for persons with developmental disabilities under [21] 30 years of age. With the exception of the services provided to adults over the age of 18 by the Moderate Security Unit, established pursuant to P.L.2006, c.5 (C.30:4-25.13 et seq.), the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services shall cease providing services for those persons with developmental disabilities under [21] 30 years of age as of the date that the Division of Children's System of Care in Department of Children and Families commences determining eligibility and providing services for these persons, except that, as agreed to by the Department of Children and Families and the Department of Human Services pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the Division of Developmental Disabilities may continue to provide services to individuals under [21] 30 years of age determined eligible for such services prior to the effective date of [P.L.2012, c.16 (C.52:27D-43.9a et al.)] P.L.  , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). The Division of Developmental Disabilities may establish rules and procedures for the transition of persons receiving services from the Department of Children and Families to adult services provided by the Division of Developmental Disabilities, including, but not limited to, a redetermination of eligibility for services.  There shall not be a presumption of eligibility for persons seeking adult services through the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services. The Division of Developmental Disabilities shall retain all responsibility for and authority over the operation of State developmental centers pursuant to R.S.30:1-7. b.    The Commissioner of Human Services and the Commissioner of Children and Families, or the commissioners' designees, shall establish and enter into an inter-agency agreement as necessary for the purposes of subsection a. of this section. c.     The Commissioners of Human Services and Children and Families, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt, notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, such rules and regulations as the [Commissioners] commissioners deem necessary to effectuate the purposes of section 158 of P.L.2012, c.16 (C.30:4C-4.4) and P.L.    , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), which shall be effective for a period not to exceed 12 months following the effective date of P.L.2012, c.16 (C.52:27D-43.9a et al.) and P.L.    , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), as applicable.  The regulations shall thereafter be amended, adopted, or readopted by the commissioners in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). d.    Whenever any current law, rule, regulation, or order, pertaining to persons with developmental disabilities, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1977, c.82 (C.30:6D-3), under [21] 30 years of age refers to the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services, the same shall mean and refer to the Division of Children's System of Care in the Department of Children and Families. (cf: P.L.2012, c.16, s.158) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the thirteenth month next following the date of enactment, except that the Commissioner of Human Services and the Commissioner of Children and Families may take administrative action in advance thereof as may be necessary for the implementation of this act.